Utah statutes.
4-3-2.   Authority to make and enforce rules.

The department is authorized and directed, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as may in its judgment and discretion be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

